California statutes. Fish and Game Code
Abalone or abalone meat legally taken outside this state may be imported into this state when accompanied by a United States customhouse entry certificate showing the place of origin, and a certificate or clearance from the responsible governmental agency to the effect that such shipment was made in compliance with the laws and regulations of the place or country of origin, and such abalone or abalone meat may be possessed in this state and shipped or transported out of the state, but all containers of such abalone shall be marked with the abalone’s place or country of origin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 462.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Dead Domesticated Birds and Mammals [2400. - 2401.]

2400.

(a) A common carrier may transport the carcass of a dead domesticated game bird or mammal tagged with a domesticated game breeder’s tag as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 3200) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 4.

(b) A tag or label shall be affixed to every package containing a carcass transported pursuant to subdivision (a), which shall state all of the following:

(1) The names of the person to whom the game breeder’s license was issued, the person who killed the game bird or mammal, the person to whom the game bird or mammal is consigned, and the person who tagged the game bird or mammal.

(2) The number of carcasses or portions thereof contained in the package.

(3) That the game birds or mammals were killed and tagged in accordance with the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 3200) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 55.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3206, the carcasses or parts of domesticated game birds which have been raised outside of this State may be imported into this State, and transported, sold, or possessed in this State.

Common carriers may receive and transport such carcasses or parts at any time. A label shall be affixed to every package containing such carcasses or parts with the following data plainly written or printed thereon:

(a) The names and addresses of the consignor and consignee.

(b) The
 number and kinds of carcasses or parts thereof.

(c) A statement that the contents are carcasses or parts of domesticated game birds raised outside this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Hunting and Fishing Guides [2535. - 2546.]

2535.

As used in this chapter, “guide” means any person who is engaged in the business of packing or guiding, or who, for a fee, assists another person in taking or attempting to take any bird, mammal, fish, amphibian, or reptile. “Guide” also includes any person who, for profit, transports other persons, their equipment, or both to or from a hunting or fishing area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2536.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to engage in the business of guiding or packing, or to act as a guide for any consideration or compensation whatever, without first having secured a guide license from the department.

(b) An employee of a licensee who acts as a guide only in connection with, and within the scope of, his or her employment is exempt from the requirement of subdivision (a) if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) If the employment is subject to and the person is reported to the carrier of the employer’s workers’ compensation insurance.

(2) If the person is subject and reported to the state and federal taxing authorities for withholding of income tax.

(3) If the person is reported to the department, on forms provided by the department, as an employee of the guide prior to any contact with any person being guided, and a registration fee has been paid. The base fee for an employee guide registration for the 2004 license year shall be thirty-three dollars ($33), which shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(c) A person who is licensed in another state to provide guide services for the purposes of fishing is exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a) if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The state in which the person is licensed grants a similar exemption to licensed guides who are residents of this state.

(2) Evidence of a valid guide license is provided to the department upon request.

(3) The person is engaged in the business of guiding only in conjunction with and during the term of a multistate fishing tournament approved by the appropriate agency in each of the affected states.

(4) The tournament sponsor provides to the department any information or documents necessary to administer and enforce this paragraph, as determined by the department, including, but not limited to, the identities of all guides participating in the tournament, verification of another state’s license exemption, and information
 sufficient to determine the validity of another state’s guide licenses.

(5) The tournament sponsor pays the department an amount, determined by the department, to be sufficient to cover the department’s cost to administer and enforce this subdivision.

(6) The net proceeds of the tournament are used for resource management projects or habitat improvement projects, or both.

(d) The commission shall adjust the amount of the fees specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission relating to those licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 559, Sec. 19.   (AB 2402)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2537.

A person operating under a commercial passenger fishing boat license issued pursuant to Section 7920 is not required to obtain a guide license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 750, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.

An application for a guide license shall be on a form furnished by the department on request. The application shall show all of the following:

(a) The name, date of birth, physical description, age, address, and telephone number, if any, of the applicant.

(b) The area or areas of the state in which the applicant proposes to operate. 

(c) The type of guiding or packing in which the applicant proposes to engage. 

(d) The experience which qualifies the applicant for the type of guiding or packing he or she proposes to conduct.

(e) The type and amount of the equipment, vehicles, animals, and other property the applicant proposes to use in his or her operations.

(f) Any other information that the department or the commission may require.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2537 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 750, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2539.

If the licensee operates with pack or riding animals in any area in which a grazing permit is required, the license is not valid unless the holder thereof has a valid grazing permit for the area. A licensee shall not guide clients on any lands under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of the Interior or Department of Agriculture where permits are required without first obtaining the permit from that federal agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 750, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2540.

(a) The base fee for a guide license issued to a resident is one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(b) The base fee for a guide license issued to a nonresident is three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

(c) A guide license is valid for the license year beginning on February 1 and ending on January 31 of the succeeding year or, if issued after the beginning of the license year, for the remainder of that license year.

(d) The base fees specified in this section are applicable to the 2004 license year, and shall be adjusted annually
 thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(e) The commission shall adjust the amount of the fees specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (d), as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission relating to those licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 559, Sec. 20.   (AB 2402)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2541.

Each applicant for a guide license shall submit proof of having obtained a surety bond in the amount of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), conditioned on faithful performance of the guide and the guide’s agents or employees in fulfilling their responsibilities to their clients. No guide license shall be issued to any applicant who does not submit proof of having a bond that is valid for the term of the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 51.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2542.

The commission shall adopt regulations governing the conduct and qualifications of guides to ensure the safety and welfare of persons engaging the services of a guide, and may adopt regulations governing the procedures for applications for guide licenses. The qualifications shall include, but not be limited to, knowledge of basic first aid and rescue operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 750, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2543.

The commission may require licensed guides to maintain and submit records of their operations. The records may be examined at any time by representatives of the department. It is unlawful for any licensed guide to fail to maintain or submit any required records or to refuse to allow the examination of the records upon the request of a department representative.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2545 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 750, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

2544.

The department may refuse to issue a guide license to an applicant upon a showing of any of the following:

(a) The applicant has failed to fulfill his responsibilities to a client.

(b) The applicant has violated this code or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, or has knowingly permitted a client or another member of a party being guided to violate this code or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto and the applicant had the authority and means to prevent the violation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2546 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 750, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2545.

An applicant denied a guide license by the department may request a hearing before the commission and the commission shall determine whether or not the license shall be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 750, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

2546.

The commission may revoke a guide license or the privilege to guide upon a showing of any of the following:

(a) The licensee has been convicted of a violation of this code or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(b) The licensee has knowingly permitted a client or other member of the party being guided to violate this code or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto and that the licensee had the authority and means to prevent the violation.

(c) The licensee has failed to fulfill his or her responsibilities to a client.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2544 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 750, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Capture, Transport or Sale of Wild Rodents [2575. - 2576.]

2575.

“Wild rodents” as used in this chapter means wild ground squirrels, chipmunks, rats, mice or any other members of the order Rodentia native to California except muskrats and beavers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 428.)
-------------------------------------------

2576.

It is unlawful to knowingly capture for sale, transport for sale or sell wild rodents, except as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 1000) of Chapter 3 of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 52.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Control of Illegally Taken Fish and Wildlife [2580. - 2589.]

2580.

The definitions in this section govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Qualified hearing officer” means an attorney admitted to the State Bar of California who is knowledgeable in fish and wildlife law.

(b) “Transport” means to move, convey, carry, or ship by any means, or to deliver or receive for the purpose of movement, conveyance, carriage, or shipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1059, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2581.

If the loss is lawful under this code and regulations adopted under this code, this chapter does not apply to the loss of any bird, mammal, amphibian, reptile, or fish as a result of any of the following acts:

(a) Implementing lawful forestry practices.

(b) Implementing lawful agricultural practices.

(c) Any development or maintenance activity carried out pursuant to the terms of a permit issued by the federal government, the state, or any city, county, or district, or any agency thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1059, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2582.

(a) The department may impose an administrative penalty upon any person pursuant to this chapter for any of the following acts done for profit or personal gain:

(1) Unlawfully export, import, transport, sell, possess, receive, acquire, or purchase, or unlawfully assist, conspire, or aid in the importing, exporting, transporting, sale, possession, receiving, acquisition, or purchasing of, any bird, mammal, amphibian, reptile, or fish which are taken or possessed in violation of this code or the regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(2) Unlawfully export, import, transport, sell, possess, receive, acquire, or purchase, or unlawfully assist, conspire, or aid in
 the importing, exporting, transporting, sale, possession, receiving, acquisition, or purchasing of any plants, insects, or other species listed pursuant to the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050)), which are taken or possessed in violation of this code or the regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(3) Unlawfully export, import, transport, sell, possess, receive, acquire, or purchase any bird, mammal, amphibian, reptile, or fish, or any endangered or threatened species, or any fully protected bird, mammal, or fish which has been taken, possessed, transported, or sold in violation of this code or the regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(4) Unlawfully possess any bird, mammal, amphibian, reptile, or fish, or any endangered or threatened species, or any fully protected bird, mammal, or fish which has been taken, possessed,
 transported, or sold in violation of this code or any regulations adopted pursuant to this code within the maritime and territorial jurisdiction of the state or within the portions of the special maritime jurisdiction of the United States upon which the State of California exercises concurrent jurisdiction, either by statute, deputization, or by contract with the United States.

(5) Having exported, imported, transported, sold, purchased, or received any bird, mammal, amphibian, reptile, or fish, or any endangered or threatened species, or any fully protected bird, mammal, or fish, unlawfully make or submit any false record, account, label, or identification thereof.

(6) Attempt to commit any unlawful act, or unlawfully attempt to commit any act, described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive.

(b) The department may
 impose an administrative penalty upon any person pursuant to this chapter for unlawfully exporting, importing, possessing, receiving, or transporting in interstate commerce any container or package containing any bird, mammal, amphibian, reptile, or fish, or any endangered or threatened species, or any fully protected bird, mammal, or fish unless the container or package has previously been plainly marked, labeled, or tagged in accordance with this code and the regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(c) The department may impose an administrative penalty upon any person pursuant to this chapter for any unlawful failure or refusal to maintain any records or paperwork as required by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 53.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2583.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who violates this code or any regulation adopted to carry out this code, and, with the exercise of due care, should have known that the birds, mammals, amphibians, reptiles, or fish, or the endangered or threatened species, or the fully protected birds, mammals, or fish were taken, possessed, transported, imported, received, purchased, acquired, or sold in violation of, or in a manner unlawful under, this code, may be assessed an administrative penalty. The administrative penalty imposed under this chapter by the department shall not be more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each bird, mammal, amphibian, reptile, or fish, or for each endangered or threatened species, or each fully protected bird, mammal, or fish unlawfully taken,
 possessed, transported, imported, received, purchased, acquired, or sold. This administrative penalty may be in addition to any other penalty, civil or criminal, provided in this code or otherwise by law.

(b) No administrative penalties shall be imposed under this chapter until the guidelines for the imposition of the penalties are adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 54.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2584.

(a) Upon an actionable violation, the department shall consult, as to the appropriate civil or criminal remedy, with the district attorney in the jurisdiction where the violation was alleged to have occurred. Before proceeding with a civil action, the department shall seek the concurrence of the Attorney General.

(b) The director, after investigation of the facts and circumstances, may issue a complaint to any person on whom an administrative penalty may be imposed pursuant to Section 2582 or 2583. The complaint shall allege the acts or failures to act that constitute a basis for an administrative penalty and the amount of the proposed administrative penalty. The complaint shall be served by personal service or certified mail and shall inform the person so served
 that a hearing shall be conducted within 60 days after the person has been served, unless the person waives the right to a hearing. If the person waives the right to a hearing, the department shall issue an order setting the penalty in the amount proposed in the complaint. If the person has waived the right to a hearing or if the department and the person have entered into a settlement agreement, the order shall be final.

(c) If the director issues a complaint pursuant to subdivision (a), the director shall appoint a qualified referee or hearing board, composed of one or any combination of the following persons:

(1) A qualified hearing officer, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2580.

(2) A retired judge of the superior court who is knowledgeable in fish and wildlife law.

(3) A qualified neutral referee, appointed upon petition to the superior court in which the violation was alleged to have occurred.

(d) Any hearing required under this section shall be conducted by the appointed referee or hearing board according to the procedures specified in Sections 11507 to 11517, inclusive, of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in this section. In making a determination, the appointed referee or hearing board may consider the records of the department in the matter, the complaint, and any new facts brought to the attention of the referee or hearing board by the person served with the complaint. The appointed referee or hearing board shall be the sole trier of fact as to the existence of a basis for liability under Section 2582 or 2583. The appointed referee or hearing board shall make the determination of the facts of the case and shall prepare
 and submit the proposed decision, including a recommended penalty, to the director for the director’s review and assistance in the penalty assessment process. The proposed decision is a public record and shall be served upon the person. The director may approve the proposed decision in its entirety, or the director may reduce the proposed penalty and adopt the balance of the proposed decision.

(e) The director may assess the recommended administrative penalty, reduce the amount of the recommended penalty, or not impose any administrative penalty, based upon the nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the prohibited acts alleged, and the degree of culpability of the violator, or the director may enter into a settlement agreement with the person served with the complaint in the best interests of the state or confirm the amount of administrative penalties contained in the complaint. If the director reduces the amount of the administrative
 penalty, does not impose the administrative penalty, or enters into a settlement agreement, the director shall seek the recommendation of the appointed referee or hearing board and enter into the records of the case the reasons for that action, including the recommendation of the appointed referee or hearing board. The decision of the director assessing the administrative penalty is final.

(f) Upon the final assessment of the administrative penalty, the department shall issue an order setting the amount of the administrative penalty to be imposed. An order setting the amount of an administrative penalty under this section becomes effective and final upon the issuance of the order, and payment shall be made within 30 days of issuance. Copies of the order shall be served by personal service or by certified mail upon the person served with the complaint and upon other persons who appeared before the director and requested a copy. Copies of the
 order shall be provided to any person within 10 days of receipt of a written request from that person.

(g) Within 30 days after service of a copy of an order setting the amount of the administrative penalty, any person so served may file with the superior court a petition for a writ of mandate for review of the order. In all proceedings pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall exercise its independent judgment on the evidence in the whole record. The filing of a petition for a writ of mandate shall not stay any other civil or criminal action.

(h) The records of the case, after all appeals are final, are public records, as defined in Section 7920.530 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 55.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2585.

The administrative penalties imposed under this chapter are in addition to any forfeiture of equipment pursuant to Section 12157 or forfeiture of birds, mammals, amphibia, reptiles, or fish pursuant to Section 12159.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 56.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2586.

(a) The director may pay a reward from any funds available for that purpose to any person who furnished information which led to an arrest, a criminal conviction, an order of assessment of an administrative penalty, or for forfeiture of property for any violation of this code or any regulation adopted pursuant to this code. The amount of reward, if any, shall be designated by the director with the advice of the CalTIP Award Board.

(b) This chapter does not apply to any action brought to recover damages under Section 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 57.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2587.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12511 of the Government Code, the department may retain or appoint legal counsel to prepare and prosecute civil actions under this chapter.

(b) Any action to recover administrative penalties imposed under this chapter shall be commenced within three years after discovery of the commission of the offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 58.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2588.

All administrative penalties and revenues from forfeitures collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 59.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2589.

The commission and the department may adopt regulations as are necessary to carry out their responsibilities under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1059, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Fish and Wildlife Habitat Enhancement Act of 1984 [2600. - 2651.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2600. - 2602.]

2600.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Fish and Wildlife Habitat Enhancement Act of 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2601.

(a) The fundamental requirement for healthy, vigorous populations of fish and wildlife is habitat. Without adequate habitat, efforts to conserve and manage fish and wildlife resources will have limited success.

(b) Assuring adequate habitat, with the resulting increase in the abundance of fish and wildlife, confers substantial benefits on the people of California through the opportunities afforded for the use, enjoyment, and appreciation of fish and wildlife resources, the perpetuation of species of fish and wildlife for their intrinsic and ecological values, and the enhancement of economic activities based on these resources.

(c) Accordingly, the purpose of this chapter is to provide the financial means to correct the most severe deficiencies in fish and wildlife habitat currently found in California through a program of acquisition, enhancement, and development of habitat areas that are most in need of proper conservation and management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2602.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Acquisition” means the acquisition of any interest in real property.

(b) “Coastal zone” means the coastal zone as defined and mapped pursuant to Section 30103 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) “Local public agency” means a city, county, city and county, regional park or open-space district, recreation and park district, resource conservation district, association of governments, or joint powers agency whose jurisdiction is wholly or partially within the coastal zone or in the San Francisco Bay region.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Habitat Enhancement Program [2620. - 2627.]

2620.

All money deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Habitat Enhancement Fund shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature for the following purposes:

(a) Forty million dollars ($40,000,000) for expenditure by the Wildlife Conservation Board pursuant to the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947 for the acquisition, enhancement, or development, or any combination thereof, of lands located outside the coastal zone for the preservation of resources and the management of wildlife and fisheries, in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for the acquisition, enhancement, or development, or any combination thereof, of lands for habitat for wildfowl and other wildlife benefitted by a marsh or aquatic environment.

(2) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for the restoration of waterways for the management of fisheries and the enhancement or development, or both, of habitat for other wildlife.

(b) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for expenditure by the Wildlife Conservation Board pursuant to the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947 for the acquisition, enhancement, or development, or any combination thereof, of lands for habitat for rare, endangered, and fully protected species.

(c) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for expenditure by the State Coastal Conservancy for the acquisition, enhancement, or development, or any combination thereof, of marshlands and associated and adjacent lands and the development of associated facilities and for grants to local public agencies for those purposes, in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for grants by the conservancy to local public agencies in the coastal zone and in the San Francisco Bay region for the acquisition, enhancement, or development, or any combination thereof, of marshlands and adjacent lands for habitat for wildlife benefitted by a marsh or aquatic environment and the improvement of drainage into wetlands to control or retard erosion and sedimentation, and biologically and hydrologically associated upland habitat areas. Of the amount made available pursuant to this paragraph, not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be available for grants for projects in the San Francisco Bay region.

(2) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for expenditure by the conservancy for the purposes authorized in this subdivision.

(d) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for expenditure by the Wildlife Conservation Board pursuant to the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947 for the acquisition, enhancement, or development, or any combination thereof, inside the coastal zone of marshlands and adjacent lands for habitat for wildlife benefitted by a marsh or aquatic environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2621.

An annual amount, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), may be appropriated from the funds available pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (d) of Section 2620 in the 1984–85 through 1989–90 fiscal years, in a particular amount to be determined in each annual appropriation, to the Wildlife Conservation Board for expenditure for costs incurred by the board in administering this chapter, as provided in this section. The board shall augment, as needed, any amount appropriated pursuant to this section with an appropriation from any other funds available to it. This chapter is not intended, nor shall it be construed, to authorize the Wildlife Conservation Board or the department to establish any additional personnel positions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2622.

An annual amount, not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), may be appropriated from the funds available pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2620 in the 1984–85 through 1989–90 fiscal years, in a particular amount to be determined in each annual appropriation, to the State Coastal Conservancy for expenditure for costs incurred by the conservancy in administering this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2623.

(a) None of the funds appropriated pursuant to this chapter may be encumbered for any purpose described in Section 1353.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 31105 and 31106 of the Public Resources Code, the State Coastal Conservancy and the State Public Works Board may not make any acquisition pursuant to the power of eminent domain with any funds appropriated pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2624.

Funds available pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2620 may be encumbered only for lands constituting habitat that is subject to destruction, drastic modification, or severe curtailment of habitat values.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2625.

No acquisition shall be undertaken with funds appropriated pursuant to Section 2620 and no grant of funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2620 shall be encumbered until all practical alternatives to direct purchase of the full fee title have been considered. The Wildlife Conservation Board and the State Coastal Conservancy shall establish a procedure to assure consideration of alternatives to direct purchase. These alternatives shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Opportunities for obtaining the land through exchanges of other publicly held lands.

(b) Tax considerations that may pertain to the contemplated transaction.

(c) Utilization of transfers of densities and density bonuses and other available land use controls.

(d) Purchase of less than full fee title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2626.

(a) All restoration projects which involve the expenditure of funds available pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2620 shall be reviewed in accordance with Section 31208, 31208.5, 31258, or 31258.5 of the Public Resources Code, as applicable.

(b) Funds available pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2620 shall be encumbered in accordance with priorities of the California Coastal Commission. 

(c) Of the total amount available pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2620, not more than four million dollars ($4,000,000) may be encumbered for any single acquisition project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2627.

(a) Funds granted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2620 for any purpose, other than acquisition, shall not be encumbered by the recipient until the conservancy has entered into an agreement sufficient to protect the public interest in any improvements constructed pursuant to this chapter with the entity that exercises legal control of the real property on which the improvement is constructed.

(b) The conservancy shall not disburse any grant until the applicant, or any other appropriate managing or operating entity, has entered into an agreement with the conservancy or its designee, or both, sufficient to assure that the property acquired, enhanced, or developed, and any improvements thereon, shall be managed and operated for the purpose for which the grant was requested. No use of the property that is incompatible with that purpose shall ever be permitted.

(c) The minimum amount for which an application for an individual project may be made is fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(d) Every application for a grant shall comply with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(e) Notwithstanding Sections 31207 and 31257 of the Public Resources Code, funds granted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2620 may be encumbered only for the acquisition, enhancement, or development, or any combination thereof, and the costs incurred by the recipient in planning, preparation of construction documents, fiscal management and accounting, and supervision of construction in connection with the project for which the grant was made. All expenditures made by a recipient of a grant shall be subject to being audited.

(f) Funds granted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2620 shall be available for encumbrance by the recipient for a period of three years after the date when the grant became effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [2640. - 2651.]

2640.

Bonds in the total amount of eighty-five million dollars ($85,000,000), or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest on the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2641.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state as shall be required to pay the principal and interest on the bonds maturing each year, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2642.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this chapter, such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal and interest on bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, as principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 2644, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the June 5, 1984, election.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Stats. 1984, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2643.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Habitat Enhancement Fund, which is hereby created. The money in the fund may be expended only for the purposes specified in this chapter and only pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature in the manner prescribed in this chapter.
